Wyoming, session 2025, HB0108.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 40-32-101 is created to read:

CHAPTER 32
MERCHANT CODES

HB0108

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0384
40-32-101. Purchase of firearms and ammunition
protections; merchant code limitations; enforcement.

(a) As used in this section:

(i) "Acquirer" means a financial institution
that acts as an intermediary between merchants and card
payment networks;

(ii) "Merchant acquiring entity" means the bank
or other organization that has the contractual obligation
to make payment to participating payees in settlement of
payment card transactions;

(iii) "Payment settlement entity" means:

(A) In the case of a payment card
transaction, the merchant acquiring entity; and

(B) In the case of a third party network
transaction, the third party settlement organization.

HB0108

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0384
(iv) "Third party settlement organization" means
an organization that has the contractual obligation to make
payment to participating payees of third party network
transactions.

(b) A payment settlement entity, merchant acquiring
entity or third party settlement organization shall not
assign a merchant category code to or otherwise classify a
merchant that is a seller of firearms or ammunition in a
way that is different from general merchandise retailers or
sporting goods retailers, except as otherwise required by
federal law.

(c) An entity involved in facilitating or processing
a payment card transaction, including a financial
institution, an acquirer, a payment card network or a
payment card issuer, shall not assign to or require a
merchant to use a merchant category code that classifies
the merchant as a firearms or ammunition retailer or places
the merchant in a similar classification. A merchant of
firearms or ammunition may be assigned or may use a
merchant category code used for general merchandise
retailers or sporting goods retailers.
HB0108

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0384

(d) Any person who violates this section is guilty of
a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of one thousand dollars
($1,000.00) for every one (1) merchant category code
assigned to a merchant in violation of this section or for
each instance that a person is classified as a firearms,
ammunition or similar retailer in violation of this
section.

Section 2. W.S. 13-10-302(a) is amended to read:

13-10-302. Unlawful discrimination against a firearm
entity; exception.

(a) A financial institution shall not discriminate
against a firearm entity:

(i) Because the firearm entity supports or is
engaged in the lawful commerce of firearms, firearm
accessories or ammunition products;.

(ii) By declining a lawful payment card
transaction based solely on the assignment or nonassignment
HB0108

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0384
of a firearms or ammunition code pursuant to W.S.
40-32-101.

Section 3. Nothing in this act shall amend, alter or
impair any contract entered into before July 1, 2025 and
this act shall apply to any contract entered into before
July 1, 2025 only upon the renewal, extension or
modification of those contractual provisions to which this
act would apply.

Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0108